Utah statutes.
17-52-101.   Definitions.

As used in this chapter:

(1)  "Appointment council" means a group of persons consisting of:

(a)  a resident of the county in which the optional plan is proposed, designated by a majority of all state senators and representatives whose districts include any part of the county in which the optional plan is proposed;

(b)  a resident of the county in which the optional plan is proposed, designated by the county legislative body;

(c)  a resident of the county in which the optional plan is proposed, designated by the petition sponsors; and

(d)  two other residents of the county in which the optional plan is proposed, designated by majority vote of the three other members of the appointment council.

(2)  "Optional plan" means a plan establishing an alternate form of government for a county as provided in Section 17-52-401.

(3)  "Reasonable notice" means, at a minimum:

(a)  publication:

(i) (A)  in a newspaper of general circulation within the county at least once a week for at least two consecutive weeks ending no more than 10 and no fewer than three days before the event that is the subject of the notice; or

(B)  if there is no newspaper of general circulation within the county, posting at least one notice per 1,000 population within the county, for at least a week ending no more than three days before the event that is the subject of the notice, at locations throughout the county that are most likely to give actual notice to county residents; and

(ii)  in accordance with Section 45-1-101 for two weeks before the event that is the subject of the notice; and

(b)  if the county has an Internet home page, posting an electronic notice on the Internet for at least seven days immediately before the event that is the subject of the notice.

(4)  "Study committee" means a group of persons:

(a)  appointed under Section 17-52-301; and

(b)  charged with the duties provided in Section 17-52-303.

